Hawaii statutes.
§26-24 Agencies and offices abolished.
The following agencies and offices and their respective boards and commissions
as heretofore constituted are abolished: board of commissioners of agriculture
and forestry, bureau of the budget, commission on children and youth, economic
planning and coordination authority, board of commissioners of public archives,
territorial planning office, Hawaii development council, department of public
works, territorial highway department, treasury department, office of the tax
commissioner, tax appeal court, boards of (tax) review, comptroller, high
sheriff, territorial loyalty board, board of health, department of
institutions, advisory boards on institutions, territorial hospital and Waimano
home appeal commission, bureau of sight conservation and work with the blind,
department of public welfare, public welfare board, council on veterans'
affairs, library of Hawaii, Hawaii county library managing board, Maui county
libraries managing board, board of public lands, commissioner of public lands,
territorial surveyor, bureau of conveyances, hydrographer, board of appraisers,
territorial commission on historical sites, Hawaii water authority, Hawaii soil
conservation committee, farm loan board of Hawaii, airport zoning board, commission
of labor and industrial relations, department of labor and industrial
relations, Hawaii employment relations board, apprenticeship council, military
department, civil defense agency, civil defense advisory council, board of
prison inspectors, dental health advisory committee, territorial advisory
committee for hospitals and medical care, fishery advisory committees, voting
machine board, disposal committee, board of disposal, commission on ground
water resources, Hawaii land development authority, department of attorney
general, commission to promote uniform legislation, department of civil
service, civil service commission, department of public instruction, board of
commissioners of public instruction, university of Hawaii, board of regents of
the university of Hawaii, and Hawaiian homes commission.

The following agencies and offices and their
respective boards and commissions shall expire at such time provided in this
Act: Kauai county libraries managing board, Hawaii aeronautics commission,
board of harbor commissioners, and fair commission of Hawaii. [L Sp 1959 2d, c
1, §38; Supp, §14A-34; HRS §26-24; am L 1989, c 211, §10; am L 1990, c 281,
§11]

Note

This "Act" refers to L Sp 1959 2d, c 1.

The amendment made by L 2014, c 111, §28 is not included in
this section.

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next